Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201657-918
Attorney General; act as legal advisor; administration of oath.

The Attorney General shall be the attorney for the Nebraska Oil and Gas Conservation Commission; Provided, that in cases of emergency or in other special cases the commission may, with the consent of the Attorney General retain additional legal counsel, and for such purpose may use any funds available under the provisions of sections 57-901 to 57-921. Any member of the commission, or the secretary thereof, shall have the power to administer oaths to any witness in any hearing, investigation or proceeding contemplated by sections 57-901 to 57-921 or by any other law of this state relating to the conservation of oil and gas.

Laws 1959, c. 262, § 18, p. 915;

Laws 2016, LB1082, § 12.
July 21, 2016